Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2866
Pharmacist; powers.

Unless specifically limited by the board or the department, a pharmacist may (1) engage in the practice of pharmacy and telepharmacy, (2) use automation in the practice of pharmacy and telepharmacy, (3) use the abbreviation R.P., RP, R.Ph., or RPh or the title licensed pharmacist or pharmacist, (4) enter into delegated dispensing agreements, (5) supervise pharmacy technicians and pharmacist interns, and (6) possess, without dispensing, prescription drugs and devices, including controlled substances, for purposes of administration, repackaging, or educational use in an accredited pharmacy program. A pharmacy shall not be open for the practice of pharmacy unless a pharmacist is physically present.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,143.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 962;

Laws 2008, LB308, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 42.